HW1/question3.foma
read lexc able.lexc
def Lexicon;

def AbleReplacement a b l e "+" i t y -> a b i l i t y;

def YReplacement y -> i e || _ "+" s    ,,
                    y -> i   || _ "+" e d  ;

def DoubleN n -> n n || _ "+" a | e | i | o | u;

def DeleteVowels a | e | i | o | u -> 0 || _ "+" (a | e | i | o | u) b ;

def EInsertion [..] -> e || c h _ "+" s;

def Cleanup "+" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o. AbleReplacement .o. YReplacement .o. DoubleN .o. DeleteVowels .o. EInsertion .o. Cleanup;
pairs
